District of Columbia statutes.
1-606.08

Attorney fees.

(a)

The Hearing Examiner or the Arbitrator may require payment by the agency of reasonable attorney fees if the appellant is the prevailing party and payment is warranted in the interest of justice.

(b)

Expired.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 607
as added May 15, 1990, D.C. Law 8-127, § 2(e), 37 DCR 2093
June 28, 2002, D.C. Law 14-166, § 2, 49 DCR 4471
D.C. Law 14-166 designated subsec. (a) and added subsec. (b).
1981 Ed., § 1-606.8.

Section 7034 of D.C. Law 17-219 repealed section 3 of D.C. Law 14-166.

Pursuant to its own terms, subsection (b) expired one year after June 28, 2002.